District of Columbia statutes.
44-1203.01

Privatization of residential substance abuse treatment.

(a)

Notwithstanding any provision of § 44-1203, the Mayor shall contract out the operation of the substance abuse Residential Short Stay and Detoxification Facilities programs that are currently operated by the Addiction, Prevention, and Recovery Administration (“APRA”) and, when appropriate, priority shall be given to locating such facilities on the campus of the D.C. General Hospital. The affected employees of APRA shall be given the opportunity to compete in this privatization, which shall be carried out in accordance with § 2-352.05.

(b)

Any amount of funding necessary for costs of severance pay related to the contracting out of the operation of the substance abuse Residential Short Stay and Detoxification Facilities program shall be paid from the administrative costs of the Addiction, Prevention, and Recovery Administration. No money for severance pay related to the contracting out shall be taken from any program funding allocated for substance abuse treatment services, including the $3 million increase allocated by the Council for community based substance abuse treatment services.

Mar. 15, 1990, D.C. Law 8-80, § 4a, 36 DCR 8469
as added Oct. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 13-38, § 1702, 46 DCR 6373
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 218, 59 DCR 6190
Section 1701 of D.C. Law 13-38 provided: “This title may be cited as the ‘Substance Abuse Treatment and Prevention Amendment Act of 1999’.”
For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 1702 of the Service Improvement and Fiscal Year 2000 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-110, July 28, 1999, 46 DCR 6320).
For temporary (90-day) authorization of citation of section, see § 1701 of the Service Improvement and Fiscal Year 2000 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-110, July 28, 1999, 46 DCR 6320).
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 substituted “in accordance with § 2-352.05” for “in accordance with §§ 2-301.05b and 2-301.05c” in (a).